Tennessee, session 114, SB0303.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 20, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) Local boards of education and governing bodies of public charter schools, as
defined in § 49-13-104, may allow schools in the LEA and public charter schools to
display the Ten Commandments, the Declaration of Independence, the United States
Constitution, the Constitution of Tennessee, the Bill of Rights, a resolution honoring the
history of a school in the LEA or the public charter school, or other historically significant
documents in a prominent location in each school building in order to educate students
on the historical significance and common cultural heritage the documents have on the
principles of the LEA or public charter school, this state, or the United States of America.
(b) LEAs and public charter schools are encouraged to display the historical
documents using wall posters or other hard copy, printed versions that are made
available to the LEAs or public charter schools free of charge.
(c) Each local board of education and each governing body of a public charter
school shall determine the size and placement of the display authorized in subsection
(a).
(d) As used in subsection (a), "prominent location" means a school entryway,
cafeteria, or common area where students are likely to see the display.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0303
000467
- 1 -